Ohio, session 136, HB337.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 2923.25 of the Revised Code be 5
amended to read as follows: 6
Sec. 2923.25. Each federally licensed firearms dealer who 7
sells any firearm, at the time of the sale of the firearm, shall 8
offer for sale provide and attach to the purchaser of the 9
firearm a trigger lock, gun lock, or gun locking device that is 10
appropriate for that firearm and shall additionally offer for 11
sale other gun locks or gun locking devices that are appropriate 12
for that firearm, if other gun locks or gun locking devices are 13
available. Each federally licensed firearms dealer shall post in 14
a conspicuous location in the dealer's place of business the 15
poster furnished to the dealer pursuant to section 5502.63 of 16
the Revised Code and shall make available to all purchasers of 17

H. B. No. 337 Page 2
As Introduced
firearms from the dealer the brochure furnished to the dealer 18
pursuant to that section. 19
As used in this section, "federally licensed firearms 20
dealer" has the same meaning as in section 5502.63 of the 21
Revised Code. 22
Section 2. That existing section 2923.25 of the Revised 23
Code is hereby repealed. 24